Utah statutes.
31A-14-203.   Admission of foreign fraternals.

(1)  A foreign fraternal may apply for authorization to transact business in Utah, by filing with the commissioner:

(a)  a certified copy of its articles and bylaws;

(b)  a power of attorney to the commissioner to receive service of process and other papers;

(c)  a certificate from the commissioner in its domiciliary jurisdiction that the fraternal is authorized to transact business in that jurisdiction;

(d)  a copy of each of its contract forms;

(e)  a statement of its business in the form required by the commissioner, showing that the business of the fraternal substantially complies with all the provisions of law relating to similar domestic fraternals; and

(f)  other information the commissioner may reasonably request.

(2)  The commissioner shall examine the applicant fraternal.

(3)  The commissioner shall grant a certificate of authority to do business in Utah if the fraternal's condition and practices protect the interests of potential insureds, creditors, and the public.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

